Final source/morphy/foma/determinant.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL +LOC +UN
LEXICON Root
DeterminantsStem;

LEXICON DeterminantsStem

මේ	determinants;
ඒ	determinants;
මෙම	determinants;
එම	determinants;
එක්	determinants;
බොහෝ	determinants;
තවත්	determinants;
යම්	determinants;
සියලු	determinants;
ඇතැම්	determinants;
වෙනත්	determinants;
හැම	determinants;
තව	determinants;
සමහර	determinants;
සෑම	determinants;
වෙන	determinants;
කිසි	determinants;
අනෙක්	determinants;
මුළු	determinants;
ඔය	determinants;
මෙවැනි	determinants;
ටික	determinants;
කිසියම්	determinants;
කිසිම	determinants;
අර	determinants;
කිසිදු	determinants;
අනික්	determinants;
අන්	determinants;
එක්තරා	determinants;
නොයෙක්	determinants;
කවර	determinants;
එතරම්	determinants;
එබඳු	determinants;
මොන	determinants;
අනෙකුත්	determinants;
මෙබඳු	determinants;
කුමන	determinants;
ඕනෑම	determinants;
සෙසු	determinants;
බොහොම	determinants;
කොතරම්	determinants;
කොයි	determinants;
කෙතරම්	determinants;
අනිත්	determinants;
හුඟක්	determinants;
සැම	determinants;
කිහිප	determinants;
කොච්චර	determinants;
කීප	determinants;
මෙවන්	determinants;
නොයෙකුත්	determinants;
අන්‍ය	determinants;
කවුරු	determinants;
වෙනම	determinants;
යම්කිසි	determinants;
අතිශය	determinants;
මෙතන	determinants;
මෙතරම්	determinants;
වැඩිපුර	determinants;
කොතෙක්	determinants;
කෙබඳු	determinants;
එතන	determinants;
මෙච්චර	determinants;
එච්චර	determinants;
නන්	determinants;
හුඟ	determinants;
ඔච්චර	determinants;
එතනට	determinants;
කෙතෙක්	determinants;
මීළඟ	determinants;
ඔතන	determinants;
අතන	determinants;
මොනයම්	determinants;
අන්කිසි	determinants;
ඔතරම්	determinants;
අච්චර	determinants;



LEXICON determinants

+N+RT: #;
